Arkansas, session 2025, SB508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-423(d), concerning the stipend for
appointed members of the Public School Employee Health Benefit Advisory
Commission, as amended by Acts 2025, No. 143, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Each appointed member who is not an active employee shall be paid
a stipend of one hundred dollars ($100) per month meeting plus mileage.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-424(d), concerning the stipend for
appointed members of the State Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission,
as amended by Acts 2025, No. 143, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Each appointed member who is not an active employee shall be paid
*ANS409*
03/18/2025 2:57:32 PM ANS409

SB508
a stipend of one hundred dollars ($100) per month meeting plus mileage.



































03/18/2025 2:57:32 PM ANS409